Nebraska, session 109, LB491.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB491 LB491
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 72-819, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
72-819 (1) The Game and Parks Commission shall award grants to a
federally recognized Indian tribe to construct, develop, and manage a
museum and visitor center honoring Chief Standing Bear.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate to the Game
and Parks Commission for the Chief Standing Bear Museum and visitor
center:
(a) Not more than seven fifteen million dollars for fiscal year
2025-26 from the Museum Construction and Maintenance Fund for
construction of the museum and visitor center; and
(b) Not more than seven million dollars for fiscal year 2026-27
Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars for fiscal year 2024-25 from the
Museum Construction and Maintenance Fund for exhibit fabrication and
historical interpretation.
(3)(a) The Game and Parks Commission shall construct, develop, and
manage a museum at Fort Robinson State Park.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate to the Game
and Parks Commission for the museum at Fort Robinson State Park not more
than seven million dollars for fiscal year 2025-26 from the Museum
Construction and Maintenance Fund.
(c) The Game and Parks Commission may execute a memorandum of
understanding or contract with the Nebraska State Historical Society for
purposes of museum development, exhibit fabrication, and historical
interpretation at Fort Robinson State Park.
Sec. 2. Original section 72-819, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-